District of Columbia statutes.
8-2209

Fees.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a schedule of fees for licenses issued under § 8-2204.

(b)

The Mayor may require reimbursement of costs for inspections, pursuant to § 8-2207.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 10, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-289: Section 13 of D.C. Law 18-289, codified as § 8-2212, provided that §§ 8-2204 through 8-2209 shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 8-2212 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008.